District of Columbia statutes.
47-2310

Repealed

Penalties.

Repealed.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 11
Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 679, ch. 690, title III, § 7
Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 11(h), 28 DCR 246
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(nn)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-2310.
1973 Ed., § 47-1911.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”